Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.210

Legislative—Street improvements.

Every ordinance or resolution ordering any street improvement or sewer complete in the form in which it is finally passed shall remain on file with the city clerk for public inspection at least one week before final passage.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.210. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 16, part; RRS s 9105, part.]